Massachusetts, session 194th, H2232.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16 of chapter 6A, as appearing in the 2008 Official edition of the
General Laws, is amended by adding, at the end thereof, the following new paragraph:
"And provided further that the secretary of the executive office of health and human
services shall ensure that network hospitals are compensated at their full negotiated rate for
behavioral health services provided to MassHealth patients who are also clients of agencies
within the executive office of health and human services and for whom no appropriate alternative
placement is available. Provided however, such compensation shall only be provided if the
hospital can document that it has engaged in good faith efforts to place said clients in any
appropriate alternative setting."
of 1